Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2310
Funds received under act; remittance.

All funds received under the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 1969, c. 144, § 10, p. 668;

Laws 1971, LB 53, § 4;

Laws 1972, LB 1496, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 162;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 19.
July 1, 2026